Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1329.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
Effective July 1, 2025, all park rangers employed by the
Oklahoma Department of Tourism and Recreation for a period of not
less than six (6) months shall receive an increase in compensation
equal to twenty percent (20%) of their current salary as of June 20,
2025.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby

Req. No. 10102 Page 1

decl ared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-1-10102 JL 01/06/25




















Req. No. 10102 Page 2